District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.08

Reserved name; transferability of right to exclusive use.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 269, Pub. L. 87-569, § 8
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.08.
1981 Ed., § 29-508.
1973 Ed., § 29-1008.